Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5537
Employment practices prohibited.

A company entering into an agreement under the Invest Nebraska Act is prohibited from requiring as a condition of employment or promotion at the project that an employee or an individual applying for employment at the project submit to a genetic test or provide genetic information outside the scope of normal blood testing.

Laws 2001, LB 620, § 37.